es: Piezas de recipientes para bebidas incluidas: Copas de champán; Posavasos; Vasos altos; Cubitera; Vasos bajos; Vasos de martini; Jarra; Vasos de chupito; Copas de vino; Otros
ru: Состав набора посуды для напитков: Бокалы для шампанского; Подставки; Бокалы для хайбола; Ведерко для льда; Бокалы для лоубола; Бокалы для мартини; Кувшин; Рюмки; Бокалы для вина; Другой
zh-TW: 包括飲用杯具: 香檳杯; 杯墊; 高腳杯; 冰桶; 酒杯; 馬丁尼酒杯; 玻璃水瓶; 烈酒杯; 紅酒杯; 其他
hu: A tartalmazott ivóedények: Pezsgőspoharak; Poháralátétek; Koktélos poharak; Jégvödör; Whiskeys poharak; Martinis poharak; Korsó; Röviditalos poharak; Boros poharak; Egyéb
fr: Verres et tasses inclus: Flûtes à champagne; Dessous de verres; Verres à whisky; Seau à glace; Verres à whisky; Verres à Martini; Lanceur; Verres à liqueur; Verres à vin; Autre
pt-BR: Peças para bebidas incluídas: Taças de champanhe; Porta-copos; Copos altos; Baldes de gelo; Copos baixos; Copos de martini; Jarro; Copo para aperitivo; Taças de vinho; Outro
pt-PT: Peças para recipientes de bebidas incluídas: Copos de champanhe; Bases de copos; Copos altos; Balde de gelo; Copos baixos; Copos de martini; Jarro; Copos de shot; Copos de vinho; Outro
hr-HR: Uključeni komadi posuđa za napitke: Čaše za šampanjac; Podmetači; Čaše highball; Posuda za led; Čaše lowball; Čaše za martini; Vrč; Čaše za žestice; Čaše za vino; Ostalo
nb: Glass og kopper inkludert: Champagneglass; Drikkebrikker; Highball-glass; Isbøtte; Lowball-glass; Martini-glass; Kanne; Shotglass; Vinglass; Annet
ko: 음료 용기 포함: 샴페인 플루트; 컵받침; 하이볼 글라스; 얼음통; 로우볼 글라스; 마티니 글라스; 피처; 샷 글라스; 와인 글라스; 기타
lt-LT: Komplekte esantys gėrimo indai: Šampano fleitos; Padėkliukai; Aukštos stiklinės; Ledo kibirėlis; Žemos stiklinės; Martinio taurės; Ąsotis; Taurelės; Vyno taurės; Kita
sv: Glas ingår: Champagneglas; Glasunderlägg; Highballglas; Ishink; Lowballglas; Martiniglas; Tillbringare; Shotglas; Vinglas; Övrigt
nl: Inclusief glazen: Champagneglazen; Onderzetters; Longdrinkglazen; IJsemmer; Whiskyglazen; Martini-glazen; Kan; Shotglazen; Wijnglazen; Andere
fi: Mukana juoma-astiat: Samppanjalasit; Lasinaluset; Highball-lasit; Jääpala-astia; Loball-lasit; Martini-lasit; Vesikannu; Shottilasit; Viinilasit; Muu
en: Drinkware pieces included: Champagne flutes; Coasters; Highball glasses; Ice bucket; Lowball glasses; Martini glasses; Pitcher; Shot glasses; Wine glasses; Other
de: Inbegriffenes Trinkgeschirr: Champagnerflöten; Untersetzer; Highball-Gläser; Eiskübel; Lowball-Gläser; Martini-Gläser; Krug; Schnapsgläser; Weingläser; Sonstiges
pl: W zestawie elementy zastawy do napojów: Kieliszki do szampana; Podstawki; Okulary do piłki nożnej; Wiadro na lód; Szkło Lowball; Kieliszki do martini; Pitcher; Kieliszki; Kieliszki do wina; Inne
sl-SI: Priloženi deli kompleta za pitje: Šampanjske piščali; Podstavki za kozarce; Visoki kozarci; Posoda za led; Nizki kozarci; Martini kozarci; Vrč; Kozarček; Kozarci za vino; Drugo
it: Bicchieri inclusi: Flute per champagne; Sottobicchieri; Bicchieri highball; Secchiello per il ghiaccio; Bicchieri lowball; Bicchieri da Martini; Brocca; Bicchieri da shot; Bicchieri di vino; Altro
sk-SK: Kusy nápojovej súpravy v cene: Šampanské; Podložky; Vysoké poháre; Vedro na ľad; Nízke poháre; Pohár na Martini; Džbán; Poháriky na liehoviny; Poháre na víno; Iné
tr: Bardak takımı parçaları dahildir: Şampanya flüt kadehleri; Bardak Altlıkları; Kokteyl bardakları; Buz kovası; Viski bardakları; Martini bardakları; Sürahi; Shot bardakları; Şarap bardakları; Diğer
bg-BG: Включени части за съдове за напитки: Чаши за шампанско; Подложки за чаши; Чаши „хайбол“; Кофа за лед; Чаши „лоубол“; Чаши за мартини; Кана; Чаши за шотове; Чаши за вино; Други
ja: グラス・カップの内容: シャンパンフルート; コースター; ハイボールグラス; アイスバケツ; ローボールグラス; マティーニグラス; ピッチャー; ショットグラス; ワイングラス; その他
ro-RO: Articole pentru băuturi incluse: Pahare înalte de șampanie; Suporturi pentru pahare; Pahare highball; Găleată pentru gheață; Pahare lowball; Pahare pentru martini; Ulcior; Pahare scurte; Pahare de vin; Altele
cs: Složení sady nápojového skla: Flétny na šampaňské; Pivní tácky; Sklenice highball; Kyblík na led; Sklenice lowball; Sklenice na Martini; Džbán; Skleničky na panáky; Skleničky na víno; Jiné
vi: Bao gồm bộ dụng cụ uống: Ly uống sâm panh; Tấm lót cốc; Ly thủy tinh cao; Xô đá; Ly thủy tinh thấp; Ly uống rượu Martini; Bình đựng nước; Cốc nhỏ đựng/đo rượu; Ly rượu vang; Khác
th: ชิ้นส่วนอุปกรณ์สำหรับเครื่องดื่มที่รวมอยู่: แก้วแชมเปญ; ที่รองแก้ว; แก้วไฮบอล; ถังน้ำแข็ง; แก้วโลว์บอล; แก้วมาร์ตินี่; เหยือก; แก้วช็อต; แก้วไวน์; อื่นๆ
da: Drikkestel medfølger: Champagneglas; Glasbrikker; Highball-briller; Isspand; Lowball-briller; Martini-glas; Kande; Shotglas; Vinglas; Andet
el: Περιλαμβάνεται εξοπλισμός ποτηριών: Σωλήνες σαμπάνιας; Σουβέρ; Ψηλά ποτήρια; Κουβάς πάγου; Χαμηλά ποτήρια; Ποτήρια Martini; Καράφα; Ποτήρια για σφηνάκια; Ποτήρια κρασιού; Άλλο
zh-CN: 包括饮具: 香槟杯; 杯垫; 高球杯; 冰桶; 低球杯; 马提尼酒杯; 大水罐; 烈酒杯/子弹杯; 酒杯; 其他